th: สไตล์เคettlebell: ปรับน้ำหนักได้; เหล็กหล่อคลาสสิก; แข่งขัน (ระดับโปร); น้ำหนักคงที่; ไมโคร; ถุงทราย; แบบนิ่ม (บรรจุทราย); สำหรับพกพา (เติมน้ำหนักได้); อื่นๆ
pl: Styl kettlebella: Regulowany; Klasyczny żeliwny; Turniejowy (profesjonalny); Ze stałym obciążeniem; Mikro; Worek z piaskiem (sandbag); Miękki (wypełniony piaskiem); Podróżny z możliwością napełnienia; Inny
fi: Kahvakuulan tyyppi: Säädettävä; Klassinen valurauta; Kilpailu (ammattilaistaso); Kiinteä paino; Mikro; Hiekkasäkki; Pehmeä (hiekkatäytteinen); Matkamalli (täytettävä); Muu
en: Kettlebell style: Adjustable; Cast iron classic; Competition (pro grade); Fixed weight; Micro; Sandbag; Soft (sand filled); Travel fillable; Other
fr: Type de kettlebell: Réglable; Classique en fonte; Compétition (qualité professionnelle); Poids fixe; Micro; Sac de sable; Souple (rempli de sable); De voyage à remplir; Autre
zh-CN: 壶铃款式: 可调节型; 经典铸铁型; 竞技型（专业级）; 固定重量型; 微型; 沙袋型; 软体型（填沙）; 旅行可填充型; 其他
ko: 케틀벨 스타일: 조절식; 클래식 주철; 대회용(전문가용); 고정 무게; 마이크로; 샌드백; 소프트(모래 충전식); 여행용(충전식); 기타
de: Stil der Kettlebell: Verstellbar; Klassisches Gusseisen; Wettkampf (Profi-Qualität); Festes Gewicht; Micro; Sandsack; Soft (sandgefüllt); Reise (befüllbar); Sonstige
nb: Kettlebell-stil: Justerbar; Klassisk støpejern; Konkurranse (pro-nivå); Fast vekt; Mikro; Sandsekk; Myk (sandfylt); Fyllbar (for reise); Annet
it: Stile della kettlebell: Regolabile; Classico in ghisa; Da competizione (professionale); A peso fisso; Micro; Sacca di sabbia; Morbido (riempito di sabbia); Da viaggio riempibile; Altro
pt-PT: Estilo do kettlebell: Ajustável; Clássico em ferro fundido; Competição (nível profissional); Peso fixo; Micro; Saco de areia; Suave (com enchimento de areia); Enchível para viagem; Outro
bg-BG: Стил на пудовка: Регулируема; Класическа от чугун; Състезателна (професионален клас); Фиксирано тегло; Микро; Пясъчна торба; Мека (пълна с пясък); Пълнеща се за пътуване; Друго
sk-SK: Štýl kettlebellu: Nastaviteľný; Klasický liatinový; Súťažný (profesionálny); Pevná hmotnosť; Mikro; Vrece s pieskom; Mäkký (plnený pieskom); Cestovný plniteľný; Iné
ja: ケトルベルスタイル: 可変式; 鋳鉄製クラシック; 競技用 (プログレード); 固定重量; マイクロ; サンドバッグ; ソフト (砂入り); トラベル用 (充填式); その他
es: Tipo de pesa rusa: Ajustable; Clásica de hierro fundido; De competición (profesional); De peso fijo; Micro; Saco de arena; Blanda (llena de arena); Rellenable para viaje; Otro
tr: Kettlebell stili: Ayarlanabilir; Klasik dökme demir; Müsabaka (profesyonel seviye); Sabit ağırlık; Mikro; Kum torbası; Yumuşak (kum dolgulu); Seyahat için doldurulabilir; Diğer
zh-TW: 壺鈴樣式: 可調式; 經典鑄鐵; 競賽級 (專業級); 固定重量; 微型; 沙袋; 軟式 (填充沙); 旅行可填充式; 其他
ru: Стиль гири: Регулируемая; Классическая чугунная; Соревновательная (профессиональная); С фиксированным весом; Микро; Сэндбэг; Мягкая (с песком); Дорожная (наполняемая); Другое
lt-LT: Svarmens stilius: Reguliuojama; Ketaus klasikinė; Varžybų (profesionali); Fiksuoto svorio; Mikro; Smėlio maišas; Minkšta (užpildyta smėliu); Kelioninė pildoma; Kita
vi: Kiểu dáng tạ kettlebell: Có thể điều chỉnh; Gang cổ điển; Thi đấu (chuyên nghiệp); Trọng lượng cố định; Siêu nhỏ; Túi cát; Mềm (nhồi cát); Dạng bơm thêm để đi du lịch; Khác
sl-SI: Stil krogelne uteži: Nastavljiva; Klasična iz litega železa; Tekmovalna (profesionalna raven); Fiksna teža; Mikro; Vreča s peskom; Mehka (polnjena s peskom); Potovalna za polnjenje; Drugo
hu: Kettlebell stílus: Állítható; Klasszikus öntöttvas; Verseny (profi minőségű); Fix súlyú; Mikró; Homokzsákos; Puha (homokkal töltött); Utazáshoz, tölthető; Egyéb
el: Στυλ kettlebell: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Κλασικό από χυτοσίδηρο; Αγώνων (επαγγελματικών προδιαγραφών); Σταθερού βάρους; Micro; Σάκος άμμου; Μαλακό (γεμισμένο με άμμο); Ταξιδιού (με δυνατότητα γεμίσματος); Άλλο
hr-HR: Stil s girjama: Podesivi; Klasični od lijevanog željeza; Natjecateljski (profesionalni); Fiksne težine; Mikro; Vreća s pijeskom; Mekani (punjeni pijeskom); Putni (punjivi); Ostalo
sv: Typ av Kettlebell: Justerbar; Klassiskt gjutjärn; Tävling (proffs); Fast vikt; Mikro; Sandsäck; Mjuk (sandfylld); Fyllbar för resor; Övrigt
ro-RO: Stilul ganterei kettlebell: Reglabil; Clasic din fontă; Competiție (profesional); Greutate fixă; Micro; Sac de nisip; Moale (umplut cu nisip); Pentru călătorii (se poate umple); Altele
da: Kettlebell-stil: Justerbar; Klassisk støbejern; Konkurrence (pro-niveau); Fast vægt; Mikro; Sandpose; Blød (sandfyldt); Til rejsebrug (kan fyldes); Andet
cs: Styl kettlebellu: Nastavitelné; Klasické litinové; Závodní (profesionální); Pevná váha; Mikro; Zátěžový vak; Měkké (plněné pískem); Cestovní plnitelné; Jiné
pt-BR: Kettlebell estilo: Ajustável; Ferro fundido clássico; Competição (grau profissional); Peso fixo; Micro; Sandbag; Macio (preenchido com areia); Para viagem preenchível; Outro
nl: Kettlebell stijl: Verstelbaar; Klassiek gietijzer; Competitie (pro); Vast gewicht; Micro; Zandzak; Zacht (gevuld met zand); Vulbaar voor op reis; Anders